District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5803

Acquisition of control of or merger with domestic insurer

Repealed.

History

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-44, § 17, 40 DCR 6027

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 35-2001 to 35-2015.